Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3704
Committee; duties.

The committee shall:

(1) Provide financial oversight and direction to the University of Nebraska Medical Center in the management of the Brain Injury Assistance Program;

(2) Develop criteria for expenditures from the Brain Injury Assistance Program; and

(3) Represent the interests of individuals with a brain injury and their families through advocacy, education, training, rehabilitation, research, and prevention.

Laws 2019, LB481, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB971, § 3.